Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-386
Residential
facilities; admission; selection by department; priority.

The department shall examine all information concerning the person
for whom admission is requested and shall determine therefrom whether the
person is a person with an
intellectual disability and whether residence in the residential
facility is necessary for the welfare, care, treatment, or training of such
person. Such determination shall be made in writing and shall set forth the
reasons for the determination. If at any time it shall become necessary, for
want of room or other cause, to discriminate in the admission of persons with an intellectual disability to
residential facilities, the selection shall be made as follows: (1) Persons
whose care is necessary in order to protect themselves or the public health
and safety; (2) persons who are most likely to be benefited thereby; (3) persons
shall next be admitted in the order in which their applications for admission
have been filed with the department; and (4) when cases are equally meritorious
in all other respects, an indigent person or a person from an indigent family
shall be given preference.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 6, p. 3065;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 50;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 803;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 56.